Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-850
Bondholders and trustee; enforcement of rights.

Any holder of bonds or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto
issued under the Nebraska Educational,
Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act and the trustee
under any trust indenture, except to the extent
the rights given in the act may be restricted by the resolution or trust indenture, may,
either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings,
protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state, the act,
or such trust indenture or resolution authorizing
the issuance of such bonds and may enforce and compel the performance of all
duties required by the act or by such trust indenture or resolution to
be performed by the authority or by any officer, employee, or agent thereof,
including the fixing, charging, and collecting of rates, rents, loan payments, fees, and charges
authorized in the act and required by the provisions of such resolution or
trust indenture to be fixed, established,
and collected.

Such rights shall include the right to compel the performance
of all duties of the authority required by the act or the resolution or trust indenture to
enjoin unlawful activities and, in the event of default with respect to the
payment of any principal of and premium, if any, and interest on any bond
or in the performance of any covenant or agreement on the part of the authority
in the resolution or trust indenture, to apply
to a court having jurisdiction of the cause to appoint a receiver to administer
and operate a project, the revenue of which is pledged to the payment of the
principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, with full power
to pay and to provide for payment of the principal of and premium, if any,
and interest on such bonds, and with such powers, subject to the direction
of the court, as are permitted by law and are accorded receivers in general
equity cases, excluding any power to pledge additional revenue of the authority
to the payment of such principal, premium, and interest, and to foreclose
the mortgage on the project in the same manner as the foreclosure of a mortgage
on real estate of private corporations.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 47;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2947;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 47;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1747;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 50.